lexica/adj_rules.lexc
LEXICON AdjInf

+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Nom+Indefinite:^ #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Nom+Definite:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Gen:+A^ega #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Dat:+A^emu #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Acc+Indefinite:+A^ #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Acc+Definite:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Acc:+A^ega #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Loc:+A^em #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Sing+Ins:+A^im #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Dual+Nom:+A^a #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Dual+Gen:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Dual+Dat:+A^ima #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Dual+Acc:+A^a #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Dual+Loc:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Dual+Ins:+A^ima #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Plural+Nom:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Plural+Gen:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Plural+Dat:+A^im #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Plural+Acc:+A^e #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Plural+Loc:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Masc+Plural+Ins:+A^imi #;

+A+General+Positive+Fem+Sing+Nom:+A^a #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Sing+Gen:+A^e #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Sing+Dat:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Sing+Acc:+A^o #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Sing+Loc:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Sing+Ins:+A^o #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Dual+Nom:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Dual+Gen:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Dual+Dat:+A^ima #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Dual+Acc:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Dual+Loc:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Dual+Ins:+A^ima #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Plural+Nom:+A^e #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Plural+Gen:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Plural+Dat:+A^im #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Plural+Acc:+A^e #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Plural+Loc:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Fem+Plural+Ins:+A^imi #;

! The +Masc here in the singular nominative and accusative is to take advantage
! rules already written to convert an o to an e in certain circumstances.
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Sing+Nom:+A+Masc^o #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Sing+Gen:+A^ega #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Sing+Dat:+A^emu #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Sing+Acc:+A+Masc^o #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Sing+Loc:+A^em #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Sing+Ins:+A^im #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Dual+Nom:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Dual+Gen:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Dual+Dat:+A^ima #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Dual+Acc:+A^i #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Dual+Loc:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Dual+Ins:+A^ima #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Plural+Nom:+A^a #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Plural+Gen:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Plural+Dat:+A^im #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Plural+Acc:+A^a #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Plural+Loc:+A^ih #;
+A+General+Positive+Neut+Plural+Ins:+A^imi #;
